Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5897.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 28A.210.370 and 2005 c 462 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The superintendent of public instruction and the secretary of the department of health shall develop a uniform policy for all school districts providing for the in-service training for school staff on symptoms, treatment, and monitoring of students with asthma and on the additional observations that may be needed in different situations that may arise during the school day and during school-sponsored events. The policy shall include the standards and skills that must be in place for in-service training of school staff.(2) All school districts shall adopt policies regarding asthma rescue procedures for each school within the district and ensure that each school within the district is supplied with an operating pulse oximeter that is kept in a location easily accessible in the event of an asthma or anaphylaxis emergency. A person who uses a pulse oximeter at the scene of an emergency and all other persons and entities providing services under this section are immune from civil liability for any personal injury that results from any act or omission in the use of the pulse oximeter in an emergency setting. The immunity from civil liability does not apply if the acts or omissions amount to gross negligence or willful or wanton misconduct.(3) All school districts must require that each public elementary school and secondary school grant to any student in the school authorization for the self-administration of medication to treat that student's asthma or anaphylaxis, if:(a) A health care practitioner prescribed the medication for use by the student during school hours and instructed the student in the correct and responsible use of the medication;(b) The student has demonstrated to the health care practitioner, or the practitioner's designee, and a professional registered nurse at the school, the skill level necessary to use the medication and any device that is necessary to administer the medication as prescribed;(c) The health care practitioner formulates a written treatment plan for managing asthma or anaphylaxis episodes of the student and for medication use by the student during school hours; and(d) The student's parent or guardian has completed and submitted to the school any written documentation required by the school, including the treatment plan formulated under (c) of this subsection and other documents related to liability.(4) An authorization granted under subsection (3) of this section must allow the student involved to possess and use his or her medication:(a) While in school;(b) While at a school-sponsored activity, such as a sporting event; and(c) In transit to or from school or school-sponsored activities.(5) An authorization granted under subsection (3) of this section:(a) Must be effective only for the same school and school year for which it is granted; and(b) Must be renewed by the parent or guardian each subsequent school year in accordance with this subsection.(6) School districts must require that backup medication, if provided by a student's parent or guardian, be kept at a student's school in a location to which the student has immediate access in the event of an asthma or anaphylaxis emergency.(7) School districts must require that information described in subsection (3)(c) and (d) of this section be kept on file at the student's school in a location easily accessible in the event of an asthma or anaphylaxis emergency.(8) Nothing in this section creates a cause of action or in any other way increases or diminishes the liability of any person under any other law.--- END ---